Utah statutes.
13-8-3.    Construction contracts and purchase orders -- Venue.
(1)  As used in this section, "construction agreement" means a construction
contract, subcontract, or purchase order for the design, construction,
installation, or repair of an improvement to real property between a:
(a)  construction manager;
(b)  general contractor;
(c)  subcontractor;
(d)  sub-subcontractor;
(e)  supplier; or
(f)  any combination of the persons described under Subsections (1)(a) through
(e).
(2)  A provision in a construction agreement requiring a dispute arising under
the agreement to be resolved in a forum outside of this state is void and
unenforceable as against the public policy of this state if:
(a)  one of the parties to the agreement is domiciled in this state; and
(b)  work to be done and the equipment and materials to be supplied under the
agreement involves a construction project in this state.
(3)  This section applies to a construction agreement executed, renewed, or
materially modified on or after May 5, 1997.
